Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 20 Interlocal Cooperation Act
25-20-405. Powers of authority.

Each authority created under this subchapter shall have the power to:

Have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate;

Maintain offices as it may deem appropriate;

Execute and perform contracts;

Sue and be sued;

Apply for and receive permits, licenses, certificates, and approvals as may be necessary and own and operate facilities in accordance with this subchapter and the interlocal agreement;

Employ the services of all personnel necessary to its operations and, in connection therewith, adopt and implement such healthcare, disability, bonus, retirement, and other employee benefit plans as the board of commissioners shall deem appropriate;

Employ the services of professionals;

Purchase insurance, maintain reserves for self-insurance, and become self-insured for the payment of compensation under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., and in compliance with the requirements of § 11-9-404(a)(2), provided that deposit of an indemnity bond, letter of credit, or securities shall not be required;

Plan, purchase, receive, own, hold, improve, use, repair, lease, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, assign, mortgage, pledge, and otherwise acquire, dispose of, and deal with real and personal property and any legal or equitable interest therein in its own name;

Apply for, receive, and use loans, grants, taxes, donations, and contributions from any public agency or other lawful source, including any proceeds from the sale of bonds;

Borrow money on a secured or unsecured basis, and in connection therewith, issue bonds, promissory notes, or other evidence of indebtedness and make and deliver indentures, mortgages, pledges, security agreements, financing statements, and other instruments encumbering assets of the authority;

Make payments to the governing body of the municipal electric utilities in such amounts as may be required or permitted by the authority's interlocal agreement and to any political subdivision in which an electric project is situated in such amounts as may be agreed to by the authority and the political subdivision;

Exercise other powers, privileges, and authorities as the participating municipal electric utilities shall have delegated to the authority by their interlocal agreement, subject to restrictions of applicable law;

Plan, construct, own, manage, operate, repair, finance, improve, extend, acquire, reconstruct, equip, sell, lease, contract concerning, deal in, dispose of, and maintain electric projects, as specified in the interlocal agreement between the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities forming an authority;

Fix, charge, collect, and, from time to time, change the rates for electricity and other goods and services provided by the authority, as specified in the interlocal agreement between the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities forming an authority; and

To the extent not inconsistent with applicable law, have other and further powers relating to the ownership and operation of an electric project as are now by law given to the governing body of any municipal electric utility and do all other acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of, and to exercise the powers granted to, the authority by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-406. Operation.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to allow municipal electric utilities to utilize the provisions of the Interlocal Cooperative Act, § 25-20-101 et seq., for the purpose of planning, developing, and operating electric projects.

Participating municipal electric utilities are authorized to contribute to an authority such real and personal property as the governing body of the municipal electric utility deems necessary or appropriate to the ownership and operation of an electric project, or as otherwise allowed by law.

However, any contributions of reserve funds held in trust under § 14-73-101 et seq. or any official action of the governing body of a municipal electric utility or other trust-related agreements shall be made on the condition that the funds may be used only for the purposes described in the applicable trust agreement and until so used shall remain in a trust fund complying with the requirements of § 14-73-101 et seq. or any applicable official action of the governing body of a municipal electric utility or any other trust-related agreements.

Governing bodies of municipal electric utilities shall have the power to execute all contracts, leases, deeds, bills of sale, easements, assignments, and other instruments of conveyance as may be required or convenient to exercise the powers granted in this subchapter.

No authority shall provide electric service at retail nor enter into contracts for the sale of energy or capacity to another party, other than the authority's participating municipal electric utilities, for a term of more than one (1) year, except in the event the Arkansas Public Service Commission authorizes a longer period pursuant to § 23-18-531[repealed].

Any authorizing resolution and any trust indenture relating to the issuance and security of the bonds shall constitute a contract between the authority and holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with the terms and provisions of the contract, and the covenants, agreements, and obligations of the authority may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding at law or in equity.

The rates, rents, fees, and other charges to be charged for the services of the electric project or the specified portion of the electric project with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds shall be sufficient to provide for:

The payment of all principal of and interest on all bonds as and when due; and

Renewals and replacements and other appropriate costs for the electric project or the specified portion of the electric project with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds.

The proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds shall be used solely for the purpose of:

Planning, purchasing, constructing, acquiring, or participating in an electric project and making betterments, improvements, repairs, and extensions to an electric project;

Paying interest on the bonds during or after the period of acquisition and construction or establishment of an electric project or betterments, improvements, and extensions thereto;

Establishing any necessary reserves for the bonds;

Paying the costs of issuing or refunding bonds; and

Paying any other costs and expenditures of whatever nature incidental to the planning, construction, acquisition, establishment, or operation of an electric project or improvements, repairs, and betterments thereto.

The terms “betterments”, “improvements”, and “extensions” include land that may be necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the authority's electric project.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be payable solely from revenues derived from the electric project or any specified portion of the electric project.

The bonds shall not in any event constitute an indebtedness of, nor pledge of the faith and credit of, the State of Arkansas or the participating municipal electric utilities or governing bodies of municipal electric utilities within the meaning of any constitutional provisions or limitations.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it:

Is issued under the provisions of this subchapter;

Does not constitute an indebtedness of the State of Arkansas or the participating municipal electric utilities or governing bodies of municipal electric utilities within the meaning of any constitutional provisions or limitations; and

Is not backed by the full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or the participating municipal electric utilities or governing bodies of municipal electric utilities.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes, including, without limitation, all income, property, and inheritance taxes.

The bonds may be sold in the manner, either at public or private sale, and upon such terms as the board determines to be reasonable and expedient for effectuating the purposes of the authority.

The bonds may be sold at any price the board may accept, including sale at discount.

The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided for by the Registered Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 et seq.

Charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of the:

Bonds and the interest on the bonds; and

Operating expenses of the electric project; and

Apply the income and revenues in conformity with this subchapter and the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds.

Applied to the payment of the obligations refunded; or

Deposited in escrow for the retirement thereof either at maturity or upon any authorized redemption date.

(1)All bonds issued under this section in all respects shall be authorized, issued, and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of those bonds.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-407. Eminent domain.

(1)Any authority may acquire any private property that it may deem necessary for its purposes by exercising the power of eminent domain in the manner prescribed in §18-15-301 et seq.

However, power of eminent domain shall not apply to any personal or real property that may be owned or leased by a public utility or any personal or real property used to generate electric energy or sell electric energy at wholesale that is owned or leased by an exempt wholesale generator, as defined in §23-1-101.

(1)An authority shall not be authorized to acquire through condemnation procedures any plant, property, facility, or business owned or operated by any public utility or pipeline company subject to the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Public Service Commission or any personal or real property used to generate electric energy or to sell at wholesale electric energy owned or leased by an exempt wholesale generator, as defined in §23-1-101.

Notwithstanding §25-20-108 and subsection (a) of this section, an authority shall be authorized to enter into any contract, agreement, or undertaking to purchase or otherwise acquire and to jointly construct or operate the plant, property, or facility.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-408. Financing.

(1)An authority is authorized to use any available funds, revenues, and long-term or short-term debt to pay and provide for the costs and expenses of accomplishing the purposes authorized by this subchapter.

For the purposes of paying the costs of any electric project or the portion thereof pertaining to its interest in the electric project, an authority may issue revenue bonds as provided in this subchapter.

(1)Whenever any authority elects, consistent with this subchapter, to plan, purchase, construct, acquire, operate, or otherwise participate in an electric project or desires to construct improvements, betterments, repairs, and extensions thereto, it may issue revenue bonds under the provisions of this section to pay the costs thereof.

The procedure for issuance of bonds shall be as provided in this section.

(1)Bonds issued in accordance with this section shall be authorized by resolution of the board of commissioners.

The bonds may be issued as registered bonds and may be exchangeable for bonds of another denomination or in another form.

The bonds may:

Be in such form and denominations as the board determines;

Have such date or dates as the board determines;

Be stated to mature at such time or times as the board determines;

Bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates as the board determines;

Be payable at such places within or without the State of Arkansas as the board determines;

Be subject to such terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices as the board determines; and

Contain such terms and conditions as the board determines.

The bonds shall have all the qualities of and shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions of registration set forth in this subsection.

The authorizing resolution may contain any other terms, covenants, and conditions that the board deems reasonable and desirable, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the:

Maintenance of various funds and reserves;

Nature and extent of any security for payment of the bonds;

Priority among successive issues of bonds;

Custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds;

Collection and disposition of revenues;

Investing and reinvesting of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes; and

Rights, duties, and obligations of the authority and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

(1)The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution of a trust indenture between the authority and any financial institution or trust company within or without the State of Arkansas.

The trust indenture may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable by the board, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the:

Maintenance of various funds and reserves;

Nature and extent of any security for the payment of the bonds;

Priority among successive issues of bonds;

Custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds;

Collection and disposition of revenues;

Investing and reinvesting of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes; and

Rights, duties, and obligations of the authority and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-409. Lien in favor of bond holders.

The payment of the principal of bonds issued under this subchapter and the interest on the bonds may be secured by a lien on and security interest in an electric project or any specified portion of an electric project.

It shall not be necessary to the perfection of the lien and pledge for such purposes that the trustee in connection with the bond issue or the holders of the bonds take possession of the collateral security.

Subject to whatever restrictions may be contained in the resolution or indenture governing the bonds, any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter may enforce either at law or in equity the mortgage lien and may compel by proper suit the performance of the duties of the officers of the issuing authority set forth in this subchapter.

If default occurs in the payment of the principal of or interest on any of the bonds, any court having jurisdiction in any proper action may appoint a receiver to administer the electric project or the specified portion of the electric project pledged to the payment of the bonds on behalf of the authority, with the power to:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-410. Refunding bonds.

(1)Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any obligations issued under this subchapter.

The refunding bonds may be combined with bonds issued under §25-20-408 into a single issue.

(1)When bonds are issued under this section for refunding purposes, the bonds may be either sold or delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations.

If sold, the proceeds may be either:

The resolution or indenture under which the refunding bonds are issued may provide that any of the refunding bonds shall have the same priority of lien on the revenues pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the obligations refunded thereby.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-411. Security deposit of public funds.

Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-412. No personal liability.

No commissioner or officer of the authority shall be liable personally for any reason arising from the issuance of bonds under this subchapter, unless he or she has acted with a willful and wanton intent.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-413. Zoning exemption.

Any authority maintaining facilities in an area zoned subsequent to the construction of the facilities may add to, alter, expand, or change the facilities upon that land or upon lands immediately adjacent thereto without regard to the zoning regulation for the area, if the board of commissioners deems the action necessary for the proper operation of an electric project.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-414. Tax-exempt status of property owners and income.

Each authority created under this subchapter will be performing public functions and will be a public instrumentality of the participating municipal electric utilities.

Accordingly, all properties at any time owned by the authority and the income from the properties, shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-415. Immunity.

This subchapter does not abrogate or in any other manner affect the immunity under existing law of the participating municipal electric utilities.

The immunity shall extend also to any authority created under this subchapter and to each commissioner, officer, and employee thereof.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-416. No public utility status.

No authority created under this subchapter shall be a:

“Public utility” within the meaning of either §§ 14-200-101 — 14-200-105 or §§ 23-1-101 — 23-4-509; or

“Person, company, or corporation that has secured a franchise from any municipality” within the meaning of § 14-200-102.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-417. Annual report and audit.

During each calendar year, each authority shall make a public, written report to the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities concerning its activities for the preceding calendar year.

Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operation during the year, including, without limitation, an audit of the authority's revenues and expenses performed by an independent certified public accountant.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-418. Provisions supplemental and controlling.

This subchapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized in this subchapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-419. Construction.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its intent and purposes and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of its purposes, and to this end it shall not be necessary to comply with the provisions of other laws relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds authorized by this subchapter.

This subchapter shall be construed as an additional and alternative method for the issuance and sale of bonds.

An authority shall not be subject to Arkansas Public Service Commission regulatory authority.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1; 2007, No. 475, § 4.

25-20-420. Use of revenue.

This subchapter does not modify the existing right of a governing body of a municipal electric utility to use available funds generated by its electric utility operations for other municipal purposes.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-421. Effect of other laws.

The provisions of any other law, except as expressly provided in this subchapter or in the other law by way of express reference to this subchapter, shall not limit or restrict the operation of this subchapter in any manner.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-422. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reliability rules and transmission upgrades, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 475, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-423. Termination or dissolution.

The governing bodies of the municipal electric utility forming an authority shall include in their interlocal agreement a provision allowing for:

The termination or dissolution of the authority;

The winding up of the authority's affairs; and

Appropriate disposal or distribution of the authority's property.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-424. Control of electric transmission facilities.

An authority created pursuant to this subchapter shall be authorized to and shall join or contract for the control of its electric transmission facilities with an independent transmission system operator, independent transmission company, regional transmission organization, or other independent transmission entity approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for this state or a larger region of which this state is a part as, if, and when other similarly situated electric transmission systems are so required to join or contract.

However, any authority established under this subchapter shall be authorized to and shall join the appropriate reliability council responsible for operations in its geographic area as appropriate.

A subsequent sale or transfer of the electric project to any municipal electric utility, public utility, or other person engaged in the selling or distributing of electricity to consumers other than a municipal electric utility, public utility, or other person engaged in selling or distributing electricity to consumers that was selling or distributing electricity to consumers on July 16, 2003; or

Providing electric service directly to an end user.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-425. Sham transactions prohibited.

An authority created pursuant to this subchapter shall be prohibited from engaging in any sham transaction.

For the purposes of this section, a “sham transaction” means the acquisition or construction of an electric project authorized by this subchapter for the purpose of:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Consolidated Wastewater Systems

25-20-501. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Consolidated Wastewater Systems Act”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.